Hawaii statutes.
§441-22.5 Mortuary, cemetery, or pre-need
funeral authority; disclosure requirements. (a) No cemetery property,
interment services, funeral services, and related commodities shall be sold
unless the mortuary, cemetery, or pre-need funeral authority first satisfies
the requirements stated in section 441-22.6.

(b) Every cemetery or pre-need funeral
authority shall be required to provide to the purchaser of cemetery property,
pre-need interment, or pre-need funeral services and related commodities a written
contract which shall contain the following disclosures:

(1) The names and addresses of the cemetery or
pre-need funeral authority, purchaser, and contract beneficiary, if the
beneficiary is someone other than the purchaser;

(2) A clear and concise itemized statement of the
property, including, for cemetery property, the location of the plot, crypt, or
niche by its unique identifier, and any services and related commodities to be
supplied or not supplied and by whom, particularly if the authority is not to
be the provider under the terms of the contract;

(3) The purchase price of each item of property,
services, and related commodities to be supplied, the total purchase price, and
how the total purchase price is payable, including any credit terms, if applicable;
provided that, pursuant to section 441-22.7, disclosure shall also be made that
further additional charges or fees for perpetual care subsequent to the
execution of the contract are prohibited for any purpose and on any occasion,
except for reasonable fees related to the administrative costs of transferring
ownership rights, including the cost of research, document and file
preparation, photocopying, notary fees, records transfer and storage, and any
other costs directly related to the transfer of ownership rights;

(4) Related costs covered under the contract;

(5) The basis on which funds are to be deposited in
trust, including:

(A) The name and address of the trustee;
provided that the disclosure shall not preclude the cemetery or pre-need funeral
authority from changing the trustee named;

(B) The percentage of the contract price for
trustable items to be placed in trust; provided that the percentage shall be no
less than seventy per cent;

(C) The percentage of the contract price for
trustable items that the cemetery or pre-need funeral authority will retain and
not deposit into the trust; provided that the percentage shall not be more than
thirty per cent; and

(D) Where a portion of the contract price
relates to property, services, or related commodities that are not trustable
items, a clear description of what those non-trustable items are;

(6) The refund, cancellation, and default provisions
of the contract, including an explanation of the requirements of section
441-22.8, and a statement in twelve-point bold type in substantially the
following form:

"YOU HAVE REFUND, CANCELLATION AND DEFAULT
RIGHTS UNDER STATE LAW AND UNDER THE CONTRACT. PLEASE READ THE CONTRACT
CAREFULLY FOR AN EXPLANATION OF THESE RIGHTS";

(7) The date and place of execution of the contract;

(8) The cemetery or pre-need funeral authority's or
its duly authorized agent's signature on the contract and the identification of
this person by name and title;

(9) A statement that the written contract, when
signed, shall constitute the entire agreement between the parties relative to
its subject matter and that all obligations of both parties shall be fixed and
enforceable by the other parties of the contract; and

(10) A statement that the contract may not waive any rights
of the consumer or duties of the cemetery or pre-need funeral authority under
the law.

(c) No mortuary, cemetery, or pre-need funeral
authority shall charge a price for the cemetery property, interment, or funeral
services, whether it be at-need or pre-need, which is greater than the price on
the itemized price list or contract which the purchaser had signed, unless the
purchaser or the purchaser's authorized representative requests an additional
item, the authority discloses the price for the additional item, and the
purchaser or its authorized representative approves the price for the
additional item. The mortuary, cemetery, or pre-need funeral authority may
charge the higher price for the additional item but shall collect in payment
only that sum which is the difference between the higher price and the price
listed on the itemized price list or contract which the purchaser had
previously signed. [L 1980, c 23, pt of §1; am L 1985, c 101, §7; am L 1998, c
232, §2; am L 2007, c 188, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next